parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/lex-newspapers.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     newspaper names
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    ITALIAN
!#
!# AUTHOR:      A. Schiller, G. Depau
!#
!# CREATED:	14-May-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# [E] http://publications.europa.eu/code/it/it-5000500.htm
!# [W] Wikipedia
!# ============================================================================
Multichar_Symbols

+Prop +Adj +NAdj


+Newspaper
+Soc


+Sg +Pl
+Masc +Fem +MF

! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space


LEXICON ROOT 


!#newspapers


Avvenire+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
Padania+Prop+Newspaper				FSG;
Repubblica+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Liberazione+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Stampa+Prop+Newspaper				FSG;
Manifesto+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Unità+Prop+Newspaper				FSG;
Foglio+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
Tuttosport+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Nazione+Prop+Newspaper				FSG;
Giornale+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
Riformista+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
City+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
Metro+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
Leggo+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
Mattino+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
Unione% Sarda+Prop+Newspaper			FSG;
Secolo% XIX+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Osservatore% Romano+Prop+Newspaper		MSG;
Libero+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
Affari% Italiani+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Secolo% d'Italia+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Milano% Finanza+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Corriere% della% Sera+Prop+Newspaper		MSG;
Gazzetta% dello% Sport+Prop+Newspaper		FSG;	
Resto% del% Carlino+Prop+Newspaper		MSG;
Corriere% dello% Sport+Prop+Newspaper		MSG;
Sole% 24% Ore+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Momento% Sera+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Free% press+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Italia% Oggi+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Messaggero+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Tempo+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
Nuova% Sardegna+Prop+Newspaper			FSG;
Sardegna+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
Giornale% di% Sardegna+Prop+Newspaper		MSG;
Gazzetta% del% Mezzogiorno+Prop+Newspaper	FSG;
Voce+Prop+Newspaper				FSG;


Cioè+Prop+Newspaper				MFSG;
Grazia+Prop+Newspaper				MFSG;
Novella% 2000+Prop+Newspaper			MFSG;
Gioia+Prop+Newspaper				MFSG;




The% Times+Prop+Soc				MSG;
El% Mundo+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Forbes+Prop+Newspaper				FSG;
Herald% Tribune+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Europa% press+Prop+Newspaper			FSG;
Le% Monde+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Courrier% International+Prop+Newspaper		MSG;
Times+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
New% York% Times+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Herald% Tribune+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Daily% Express+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
London% Daily+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Daily% Record% and% Sunday% Mail+Prop+Newspaper	MSG;
Daily% Telegraph+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Guardian+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
Herald+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
Independent+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Mirror+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
The% Observer+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Observer+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
Sun+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
Sunday% Times+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
La% Gauche+Prop+Newspaper			FSG;
La% Voix+Prop+Newspaper				FSG;
Le% Figaro+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Le% Français% dans% le% monde+Prop+Newspaper	MSG;
Le% Monde% Diplomatique+Prop+Newspaper		MSG;
Le% Parisien+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Le% Petit% Quotidien+Prop+Newspaper		MSG;
Libération+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Paris% Match+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Feed+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
Life+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
National% Geographics+Prop+Newspaper		MSG;
New% Republic+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
OneEurope+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
PoliticsNow+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Reader's% Digest+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Stern+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
US% News+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
Christian% Science% Monitor+Prop+Newspaper	MSG;





!# press agencies

ADN% KRONOS+Prop+Newspaper			FSG;
Adnkronos+Prop+Newspaper			FSG;
ign+Prop+Newspaper				FSG;
AFP% -% Agence% France% Press+Prop+Newspaper	FSG;
Agence% France% Press+Prop+Newspaper		FSG;
afp+Prop+Newspaper				FSG;
AGI% -% Agenzia% Giornalistica% Italia+Prop+Newspaper		FSG;
Agenzia% Giornalistica% Italia+Prop+Newspaper	FSG;
agi+Prop+Newspaper				FSG;
ANSA% -% Agenzia% Italiana% di% Informazione+Prop+Newspaper	FSG;
Agenzia% Italiana% di% Informazione+Prop+Newspaper		FSG;
Ansa+Prop+Newspaper				FSG;
ASCA+Prop+Newspaper				FSG;
PA% -% The% Press% Association+Prop+Newspaper	MSG;
Press% Association+Prop+Newspaper		MSG;
PaceLink% News+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
Reuters+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
Telpress+Prop+Newspaper				MSG;
eurosport+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
ap+Prop+Newspaper				FSG;


!# Television (they will be moved from here); I couldn't save "Italia #1, Rete # 4 and Canale# 5"
RAI1+Prop+Newspaper			FSG;
RAI2+Prop+Newspaper			FSG;
RAI3+Prop+Newspaper			FSG;
Televideo+Prop+Newspaper		MSG;
TG1+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
TG2+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
TG3+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
TG4+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;
TG5+Prop+Newspaper			MSG;





!# continuation classes
LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MFSG	+MF+Sg		#;
